Washington statutes.
RCW 38.38.196

[Art. 21a] Complete record of proceedings and testimony if dishonorable discharge or dismissal adjudged.

A dishonorable discharge or dismissal may not be adjudged by any court-martial unless a complete record of the proceedings and testimony before the court has been made.

[ 1989 c 48 s 20; 1963 c 220 s 22.]